Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2244.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 12-1567, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE12-1567. Satisfaction of judgment; superior court; filing procedures; hearing; bond A. The prevailing party shall file a satisfaction of judgment in the superior court within forty days after a judgment has been paid in full. B. If the prevailing party fails to file a satisfaction of judgment or cannot be located after the opposing party has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the prevailing party, the opposing party may file a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. The opposing party shall include with the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment an affidavit that evidences proof of payment and, if necessary, the due diligence that was performed in attempting to locate the prevailing party. If the motion is granted, the judgment is deemed satisfied. C. A judge may hold a hearing on the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. D. A judge may compel the moving party to post a bond with the court in the amount of the judgment. E. Notwithstanding subsections B and C of this section, If a tenant files a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment against a landlord following an eviction action and the landlord fails to respond to the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment within fifteen days after the motion is filed, all of the following apply: 1. the fee for filing a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment is waived. 2. The judge may not hold a hearing on the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. 3. The judgment is deemed satisfied if the tenant submits proof of payment. 4. The judge may issue an order sealing all records related to the eviction action pursuant to section 33-1379.END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 22-247, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE22-247. Satisfaction of judgment; filing procedures; hearing; bond A. The prevailing party shall file a satisfaction of judgment in the justice court within forty days after a judgment has been paid in full. B. If the prevailing party fails to file a satisfaction of judgment or cannot be located after the opposing party has exercised due diligence in attempting to locate the prevailing party, the opposing party may file a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. The opposing party shall include with the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment an affidavit that evidences proof of payment and, if necessary, the due diligence that was performed in attempting to locate the prevailing party. If the motion is granted, the judgment is deemed satisfied. C. A justice of the peace may hold a hearing on the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. D. A justice of the peace may compel the moving party to post a bond with the justice court in the amount of the judgment. E. Notwithstanding subsections B and C of this section, If a tenant files a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment against a landlord following an eviction action and the landlord fails to respond to the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment within fifteen days after the motion is filed and served as required by the rules of procedure for eviction actions, all of the following apply: 1. the fee for filing a motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment is waived. 2. The justice of the peace may not hold a hearing on the motion to compel satisfaction of the judgment. 3. The judgment is deemed satisfied if the tenant submits an affidavit that evidences proof of payment. 4. The justice of the peace, AT the justice of the peace's discretion, may SEAL THE EVICTION pursuant to section 33-1379 IF THE justice of the peace believes THAT SEALING THE RECORD IS AN APPROPRIATE REMEDY GIVEN THE LANDLORD'S FAILURE TO COMPLY WITH SUBSECTION A of this section. END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.